Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.231

Licenses—Office or records depositories required—Record maintenance and production.

Every licensed real estate firm must have and maintain an office or records depositories accessible in this state to representatives of the director. The firm must maintain and produce a complete set of records as required by this chapter. The director may prescribe rules for alternative and electronic record storage.

[ 2008 c 23 s 24; 1997 c 322 s 15; 1957 c 52 s 41; 1951 c 222 s 15. Prior: 1947 c 203 s 4, part; 1945 c 111 s 7, part; 1943 c 118 s 4, part; 1941 c 252 s 18, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 8340-41, part; prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 12, part. Formerly RCW 18.85.180.]